District of Columbia statutes.
44-902

Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter:

(1)

The term “Hospital” means the institution in the District of Columbia known as Saint Elizabeths Hospital operated on November 8, 1984, by the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(2)

The term “Secretary” means the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(3)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(4)

The term “District” means the District of Columbia.

(5)

The term “federal court consent decree” means the consent decree in Dixon v. Heckler, Civil Action No. 74-285.

(6)

The term “service coordination period” means a period beginning on October 1, 1985, and terminating on October 1, 1987.

(7)

The term “financial transition period” means a period beginning on October 1, 1985, and terminating on October 1, 1991.

(8)

The term “system implementation plan” means the plan for a comprehensive mental health system for the District of Columbia to be developed pursuant to this subchapter.

(9)

The term “Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 3
1981 Ed., § 32-622.
For effective date of this subchapter, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 44-901.